Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. State Board of Embalming

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of state board of embalming relative to licensing, etc., of embalmers generally, see §

33-16-101

et seq.

For duty of secretary of state board of embalming to keep records on persons to whom a certificate or license has been issued relative to embalming, see §

33-16-102

.

For duty of secretary of state board of embalming to furnish copy of records showing licensed embalmers to transportation companies, see §

33-16-102

.

For provision that the state board of embalming and schools for teaching embalming shall have the same privilege as to dissecting, etc., human bodies as is granted to medical colleges, see §

33-16-107

.

For duty of state board of embalming to furnish shipping pasters to embalmers, see §

33-16-109

.

As to powers and duties of state board of embalming relative to licensing, etc., of funeral directors and undertakers, see art. 3 of this chapter.

As to crematories, see art. 4 of this chapter.

§ 33-16-201.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3626; R.S. 1931, § 37-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-1201; W.S. 1957, § 33-224; Laws 1967, ch. 39, § 1; 1971, ch. 27, § 13; 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2009, ch. 21, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1913, ch. 64, §§ 1 through 3, 8, 15, 16,
Laws 2003, ch. 83, §
1, related to State Board of Embalming.

§ 33-16-202.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3627; R.S. 1931, § 37-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-1202; W.S. 1957, § 33-225; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-203.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3628; R.S. 1931, § 37-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-1203; W.S. 1957, § 33-226; Laws 1967, ch. 39, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-204.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 3633; R.S. 1931, § 37-107; C.S. 1945, § 37-1208; W.S. 1957, § 33-227; Laws 1969, ch. 156, § 2; 1979, ch. 115, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-205.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 16; C.S. 1920, § 3641; R.S. 1931, § 37-115; C.S. 1945, § 37-1216; Laws 1957, ch. 244, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-228; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-206.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1913, ch. 64, § 15; C.S. 1920, § 3640; R.S. 1931, § 37-114; C.S. 1945, § 37-1215; W.S. 1957, § 33-229; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-207.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 2003, ch. 83, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.